Utah statutes.
72-2-109.   Rules for uniform accounting -- Apportionment and use of class B
and class C road funds -- Compliance with federal-aid provisions -- Duties of
department.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules providing for uniform accounting of funds
to be expended upon class B and C roads as required by the federal government
under Title 23, United States Code Annotated, relating to federal aid for
highway purposes together with all amendatory acts.
(2)  The department shall cooperate with the county governing bodies and the
governing officials of the cities and towns in the apportionment and use of
class B and C road funds.
